Utah statutes.
16-10a-840.   General standards of conduct for directors and officers.
(1)  Each director shall discharge his duties as a director, including duties
as a member of a committee, and each officer with discretionary authority
shall discharge his duties under that authority:
(a)  in good faith;
(b)  with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would
exercise under similar circumstances; and
(c)  in a manner the director or officer reasonably believes to be in the best
interests of the corporation.
(2)  In discharging his duties, a director or officer is entitled to rely on
information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements
and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:
(a)  one or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director or
officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters
presented;
(b)  legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the
director or officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional
or expert competence; or
(c)  in the case of a director, a committee of the board of directors of which
he is not a member, if the director reasonably believes the committee merits
confidence.
(3)  A director or officer is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge
concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by
Subsection (2) unwarranted.
(4)  A director or officer is not liable to the corporation, its shareholders,
or any conservator or receiver, or any assignee or successor-in-interest
thereof, for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as an
officer or director, as the case may be, unless:
(a)  the director or officer has breached or failed to perform the duties of
the office in compliance with this section; and
(b)  the breach or failure to perform constitutes gross negligence, willful
misconduct, or intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the
shareholders.
